Utah statutes.
78B-6-1243.   Partition -- Payment of costs -- Enforcement of judgment.

(1)  The costs of partition, including reasonable attorney fees, expended by the plaintiff or any of the defendants for the common benefit, fees of referees and other disbursements shall be paid by the parties entitled to share in the lands divided, in proportion to their respective interests, and may be included and specified in the judgment.  The costs shall be a lien on the several shares, and the judgment may be enforced by execution against the shares and against other property held by the respective parties.

(2)  If litigation arises between some of the parties, the court may require the expenses of the litigation to be paid by the parties to the litigation.

